Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1034.
do enact as follows:AB1034,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1034,211Section 2. 20.285 (1) (cj) of the statutes is created to read:AB1034,3,141220.285 (1) (cj) Athletic facilities maintenance; principal and interest. The 13amounts in the schedule for principal and interest costs for maintenance of 14University of Wisconsin-Madison intercollegiate athletic facilities.AB1034,315Section 3. 20.285 (1) (ck) of the statutes is created to read:AB1034,3,181620.285 (1) (ck) Klotsche Center maintenance; principal and interest. The 17amounts in the schedule for principal and interest costs for maintenance of the 18University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee Klotsche Center.AB1034,419Section 4. 20.285 (1) (cL) of the statutes is created to read:AB1034,3,222020.285 (1) (cL) Soccer complex maintenance; principal and interest. The 21amounts in the schedule for principal and interest costs for maintenance of the 22University of Wisconsin-Green Bay soccer complex.AB1034,523Section 5. 20.285 (1) (gj) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1034,4,82420.285 (1) (gj) Self-amortizing facilities principal and interest. From revenues 1credited under par. (gb), a sum sufficient to reimburse s. 20.866 (1) (u) for any 2amounts advanced to meet principal and interest costs on self-amortizing 3university facilities and to make payments under an agreement or ancillary 4arrangement entered into under s. 18.06 (8) (a). For projects authorized by the 5building commission on or after July 1, 2001, annually an amount equal to 40 6percent of the principal and interest costs for maintenance of University of 7Wisconsin-Madison intercollegiate athletic facilities shall be paid from the 8appropriation under this paragraph.AB1034,69Section 6. 36.11 (12) of the statutes is created to read:AB1034,4,111036.11 (12) Athletic programs; Name, image, and likeness rights. (a) In 11this subsection:AB1034,4,12121. “Athletic association or conference” means any of the following:AB1034,4,1413a. An athletic association with authority over an intercollegiate athletic 14program.AB1034,4,1615b. An athletic conference with authority over an intercollegiate athletic 16program.AB1034,4,1817c. Any group or organization other than those specified in subd. 1. a. and b. 18with authority over an intercollegiate athletic program.AB1034,4,22192. “Intercollegiate athletic program” means a program established by an 20institution that allows sports played at the collegiate level for which eligibility 21requirements for participation by a student athlete are established by a national 22association or athletic conference that promotes or regulates collegiate athletics.AB1034,5,2233. “Student athlete” means any student who attends or has agreed to attend 1an institution and participates or has agreed to participate in an intercollegiate 2athletic program.AB1034,5,43(b) The board may enter into agreements providing for the compensation of 4student athletes for use of the student-athletes’ name, image, or likeness.AB1034,5,65(c) Neither the board nor an institution may adopt or enforce a policy that 6prohibits any of the following:AB1034,5,871. The use of a student-athlete’s name, image, or likeness when the student 8athlete is not engaged in official team activities as defined by the board.AB1034,5,1192. The student athlete from obtaining professional representation relating to 10the use of the student-athlete’s name, image, or likeness, including representation 11by an agent or licensed attorney for legal matters.AB1034,5,1512(d) The board may not use general purpose revenue to create, facilitate, 13negotiate, support, assist with, or otherwise enable opportunities for a student 14athlete to earn compensation for use of the student-athlete’s name, image, or 15likeness.AB1034,5,1716(e) Compensation paid to a student athlete under this subsection is not a 17grant under sub. (6).AB1034,5,2018(f) A student athlete who enters into an agreement under this subsection to 19receive compensation for use of the student-athlete’s name, image, or likeness is not 20an employee of the system because of the agreement.AB1034,5,2321(g) A student athlete shall disclose in the manner prescribed by the board or 22institution each 3rd-party agreement for the use of the student-athlete’s name, 23image, or likeness before the student athlete enters into the agreement.AB1034,6,21(h) A student athlete may not enter into an agreement for the use of the 2student-athlete’s name, image, or likeness if any of the following applies:AB1034,6,531. Any provision of the agreement conflicts with a provision of an agreement 4of the board or with a policy of the board or a policy of the institution or an 5intercollegiate athletic program.AB1034,6,762. The compensation for the use of the student-athlete’s name, image, or 7likeness in the agreement is provided in exchange for any of the following:AB1034,6,88a. Athletic performance.AB1034,6,139b. Endorsement of cigarettes, as defined in s. 134.65 (1a) (a); tobacco products, 10as defined in s. 134.65 (1a) (c); electronic vaping devices, as defined in s. 134.65 (1a) 11(b); alcohol beverages, as defined in s. 125.02 (1); gambling, including sports betting 12and casino gambling; banned athletic substances, including anabolic steroids; any 13illegal substance or illegal activity; or any other activity proscribed by the board.AB1034,6,1714(i) To protect competitive interests and student privacy, records relating to any 15of the following in the custody of the board, an institution, or other formally 16constituted subunit of the board are not subject to public inspection, copying, or 17disclosure under s. 19.35:AB1034,6,19181. Any term or detail of an agreement or proposed agreement for the use of a 19student-athlete’s name, image, or likeness.AB1034,6,23202. Generation, deployment, or allocation of revenue generated by an 21intercollegiate athletic program that are the subject of reasonable efforts under the 22circumstances to maintain the secrecy of the records, when competitive reasons 23require confidentiality.AB1034,7,324(j) Any person’s activity that compensates a student athlete for the use of the 1student-athlete’s name, image, or likeness may not be considered an act on behalf of 2the board if the person is a separate legal entity from the board and the board does 3not own or control the person. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1034 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1034 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1034 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1034 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1034: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting